Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 241.3, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 241.3. A. Except as otherwise provided by law or

waiver, all able-bodied recipients eighteen (18) years of age to

fifty (50) years of age, who are not disabled or raising minor

children, An individual who does not qualify for an exception

provided by 7 U.S.C., Section 2015(o)(3) may receive food stamps

Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits for only

three (3) months in each thirty-six-month period except in months in

which such recipients are employed for at least twenty (20) or more

hours per week individual meets the work requirement established by

Req. No. 2204 Page 1

7 U. S.C., Section 2015(o)(2). The Department of Human Services

shall enforce the provisions of this section and any approved

waivers or other provisions pursuant to law in effect for this state

as of the effective date of this act in designated areas and

populations 7 U.S.C., Section 2015(o).

B. 1. A family household applying for food stamps SNAP

benefits after the fifteenth (15th) day of each month shall be

eligible to receive the total amount of their the household’s

initial allotment and their its regular first allotment.

2. A household allotment of food stamps SNAP benefits may be

reduced by up to twenty-five percent (25%) if a family the household

is sanctioned in another program established pursuant to the

Statewide Temporary Assistance Responsibility System.

3. An individual in a treatment center shall designate the

treatment center as the recipient of such individual’s food stamp

SNAP benefit allotment.

4. Operating procedures for the food stamp programs SNAP in

local offices may vary to reflect local differences.

5. The Department is authorized to use the amount of a

household food stamp SNAP benefit allotment to subsidize a job under

a work supplementation or support program.

C. Beginning October 1, 2013, the The Department of Human

Services shall not request a waiver to provide Supplemental

Nutrition Assistance Program services to able-bodied adults without

Req. No. 2204 Page 2

depe ndents of the SNAP work requirement under 7 U.S.C., Section

2015(o)(4).

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-2-2204 DC 12/15/2025 4:22:39 PM

































Req. No. 2204 Page 3